Oklahoma, session 2026, SB288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2357.701 of Title 68, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. For tax year 2026 and subsequent tax years, there shall be


allowed against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of Title 68 of the


Oklahoma Statutes a credit for individuals that are members of the


Oklahoma Army National Guard or Oklahoma Air National Guard who


purchase a residence in this state.


B. The credit authorized shall be equal to the down payment and


closing costs associated with the purchase not to exceed Four


Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00). The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall

Req. No. 1559 Page 1


provide a form for individuals to apply for the credit and submit


verification of down payment and payment of closing costs.


C. The credit provided by this section shall be refundable. No


more than one credit provided by this section shall be claimed by an


individual.


D. The Oklahoma Tax Commission may promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1559 QD 12/30/2024 11:17:55 PM





























Req. No. 1559 Page 2